Utah statutes.
63B-11-312.   Refunding of bonds.

(1)  The commission may provide for the refunding of any of the bonds in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act.

(2)  For purposes of Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act, the state of Utah is considered the public body and the commission its governing body.



Enacted by Chapter 278, 2002 General Session

